Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 10.1 Special License for Motorcycles, Motor Scooters, and Other Motor Driven Cycles

31-10.1-1.
License required.

No resident of this state, except those expressly exempted in this chapter, shall drive any two-wheeled (2) motorcycle or motor-driven cycle upon a highway in this state, unless the person shall first obtain a special license as an operator under the provisions of this chapter; provided, however, motorized bicycles and motor scooters with a motor rated not more than four and nine-tenths horsepower (4.9 h.p.) and not greater than fifty cubic centimeters (50 cc), which is capable of a maximum speed of not more than thirty miles per hour (30 m.p.h.), shall be exempt from the provisions of this section. No person shall be licensed pursuant to this chapter unless he or she shall be at least sixteen (16) years of age or unless the person previously has been issued a full operator’s license and a motorcycle learner’s permit or is already licensed under a prior act of this state. Any person under the age of eighteen (18) duly licensed under the prior act shall be eligible to have his or her license renewed in the same manner as persons over the age of eighteen (18). All licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall reflect any requirement of the operator to wear a helmet pursuant to §

31-10.1-4

.

No resident of this state, except those expressly exempted in this chapter, shall drive any three-wheeled (3) motorcycle or motor-driven cycle upon a highway in this state, unless the person shall first obtain a special license as an operator under the provisions of this chapter; provided, however, motorized bicycles and motor scooters with a motor rated not more than four and nine-tenths horsepower (4.9 h.p.) and not greater than fifty cubic centimeters (50 cc), which is capable of a maximum speed of not more than thirty miles per hour (30 m.p.h.), shall be exempt from the provisions of this section. No person shall be licensed pursuant to this chapter unless he or she shall be at least sixteen (16) years of age or unless the person previously has been issued a full operator’s license and a motorcycle learner’s permit or is already licensed under a prior act of this state. Any person under the age of eighteen (18) years duly licensed under the prior act shall be eligible to have their license renewed in the same manner as persons over the age of eighteen (18) years. All licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall reflect any requirement of the operator to wear a helmet pursuant to §

31-10.1-4

.

Any person currently licensed pursuant to this chapter, prior to March 1, 2022, shall continue to be permitted to operate both two-wheeled (2) and three-wheeled (3) motorcycles and motor-driven cycles without further examination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 324, § 15; P.L. 1992, ch. 364, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 371, § 3; P.L. 1998, ch. 386, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 11, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 12, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 412, § 1, effective March 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 413, § 1, effective March 1, 2022.

31-10.1-1.1.
Motorcycle driver education program.

The council on postsecondary education and the office of the postsecondary commissioner shall through the Community College of Rhode Island provide:

A minimum of six (6) and up to a maximum of twenty (20) hours of classroom instruction and/or on-the-road driver training, as determined by the council and/or the Community College of Rhode Island, for applicants or prospective applicants for a first motorcycle operator’s license to operate two-wheeled (2) motorcycles under this chapter; and

A minimum of six (6) and up to a maximum of twenty (20) hours of classroom instruction and/or on-the-road driver training, as determined by the council and/or the Community College of Rhode Island, for applicants or prospective applicants for a first motorcycle operator’s license to operate three-wheeled (3) motorcycles under this chapter. Instruction shall be given by a person eligible for a teacher’s certificate issued under the authority of the council on elementary and secondary education and/or certified to teach motorcycle safety classes by completion of a course of instruction recognized by the Community College of Rhode Island.

Motorcycle driver education programs shall be available to any eligible resident applicant holding a valid Rhode Island motor vehicle operator’s license.

The council on postsecondary education shall establish any fees that are deemed necessary to support this program.

The council on postsecondary education and the office of the postsecondary commissioner are authorized to establish regulations to further implement this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 364, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 412, § 1, effective March 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 413, § 1, effective March 1, 2022.

31-10.1-1.2.
Approved motorcycle rider education program.

The council on postsecondary education and/or the Community College of Rhode Island may certify motorcycle dealers engaged in selling motorcycles or an association engaged in motorcycle safety to provide motorcycle driver education courses in the state if the curriculum used during the course of instruction is certified by the Motorcycle Safety Foundation, or other programs approved by the council and/or the Community College of Rhode Island.

The course of instruction for operation of two-wheeled (2) motorcycles shall provide students with a minimum of sixteen and a half (161/2) hours of combined classroom instruction, and on the range motorcycle training for a beginner rider course, and a minimum of five (5) hours for a licensed rider course.

The course of instruction for operation of three-wheeled (3) motorcycles shall provide students with a minimum of sixteen and a half (161/2) hours of combined classroom instruction, and on the range motorcycle training for a beginner rider course, and a minimum of five (5) hours for a licensed rider course.

In order for an instructor to teach in a motorcycle rider education program in the state, the person shall meet all of the following requirements:

Must be twenty-one (21) years of age or older, and must possess a valid drivers license recognized by the state of Rhode Island for at least three (3) consecutive years;

Possess a high school diploma or GED;

Must be certified by the Motorcycle Safety Foundation as an instructor;

Must be licensed to teach motorcycle training in the state of Rhode Island;

An instructor has not had more than one moving traffic violation within one year prior to obtaining certification; not more than two (2) moving violations within a three-year (3) period prior to licensure as a motorcycle rider education instructor; and not more than three (3) moving violations within a five-year (5) period prior to licensure as a motorcycle rider education instructor;

An instructor has not had their driving privileges suspended or revoked in the five (5) preceding years prior to obtaining certification by the state of Rhode Island;

An instructor has no driving under the influence of alcohol or drug convictions within ten (10) years prior to obtaining certification by the state of Rhode Island as a motorcycle rider education instructor;

Must successfully pass a criminal background check by the department;

For out of state instructors, the person must provide the department with a certified copy of their driving record from the previous five (5) years.

Class sizes shall not exceed twenty-four (24) students in the classroom, and twelve (12) on the range during instruction.

A student, unless specified under §

31-10.1-2

, who successfully completes a department approved two-wheeled (2) motorcycle rider education program’s skills and written test requirements, shall be deemed compliant with §

31-10.1-1.1(a)(1)

and exempted from the road test under §

31-10.1-3(a)

provided the student passes a written, vision, and road sign examination at a department licensing facility. A student, unless specified under §

31-10.1-2

, who successfully completes a department approved three-wheeled (3) motorcycle rider education program’s skills and written test requirements, shall be deemed compliant with §

31-10.1-1.1(a)(2)

and exempted from the road test under §

31-10.1-3(b)

, provided the student passes a written, vision, and road sign examination at a department facility. In order to take the written, vision, and road sign examination under §

31-10.1-3(a)

or (b) the student shall bring their Motorcycle Safety Foundation completion card and a road test waiver form provided by the rider education program where the course was successfully completed. The road test waiver form shall include the following:

Student’s full name, as written on their valid drivers license;

Motorcycle Safety Foundation’s Basic Rider Course Completion Card number;

Course completion date;

Dealership or association name;

Dealership or association contact name;

MSF Rider Education Recognition Program number, or equivalent;

Instructor’s name, signature, and Motorcycle Safety Foundation number or an identifier from any other program approved by the council and/or the Community College of Rhode Island instructor number.

The department or the Community College of Rhode Island has the right to inspect ranges to ensure they fulfill the Motorcycle Safety Foundation’s range standards for motorcycle training. The department shall have the right to inspect the courses authorized under this section at any time. The entity providing the motorcycle rider education program shall maintain records for a minimum of two (2) years, including those who participated in the class, those who successfully completed the class, and those individuals who failed any portion of the class.

No state subsidies shall be provided to a dealer or association for operating a motorcycle driver education program under this section.

The state of Rhode Island shall not be liable for any acts or omissions on the part of motorcycle dealers and/or associations in the implementation of the motorcycle rider education program pursuant to this section.

Each dealership and/or association seeking to provide a motorcycle driver education course under this chapter shall pay an application fee of seven hundred and fifty dollars ($750) and a yearly renewal fee of one hundred dollars ($100) to the office of higher education for the purpose of program oversight.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 96, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 147, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 412, § 1, effective March 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 413, § 1, effective March 1, 2022.

31-10.1-2.
Learner’s permit.

Upon applying for a first license to drive a two-wheeled (2) motorcycle and after successfully completing a motorcycle driver education program pursuant to §

31-10.1-1.1(a)(1)

and after satisfying the requirements of §

31-10.1-3(a)

, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles may issue a motorcycle learner’s permit to take instruction in the operation of a two-wheeled (2) motorcycle which entitles the holder to operate or drive a two-wheeled (2) motorcycle on the public highway, other than a limited access highway, as a learner, under the general supervision, and whether or not under the immediate control, of a licensed motorcycle operator, at least eighteen (18) years of age.

Upon applying for a first license to drive a three-wheeled (3) motorcycle and after successfully completing a motorcycle driver education program pursuant to §

31-10.1-1.1(a)(2)

and after satisfying the requirements of §

31-10.1-3(b)

, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles may issue a motorcycle learner’s permit to take instruction in the operation of a three-wheeled (3) motorcycle which entitles the holder to operate or drive a three-wheeled (3) motorcycle on the public highway, other than a limited access highway, as a learner, under the general supervision, and whether or not under the immediate control, of a licensed motorcycle operator, at least eighteen (18) years of age.

A person who has been issued a learner’s permit may not carry passengers other than the supervising driver on the motorcycle until the person has been licensed to operate a motorcycle.

The following persons are eligible for a motorcycle learner’s permit:

A person who is at least sixteen (16) years old but less than eighteen (18) years old and has a limited provisional license or a full operator’s license issued by the division of motor vehicles.

A person who is at least eighteen (18) years old and has a license issued by the division of motor vehicles.

The holder of a motorcycle learner’s permit who has a limited provisional license may drive the motorcycle only at times when the license holder could drive a motor vehicle without supervision pursuant to §

31-10-14

.

A motorcycle learner’s permit expires eighteen (18) months after it is issued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 184, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 371, § 3; P.L. 1998, ch. 386, § 3; P.L. 2021, ch. 412, § 1, effective March 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 413, § 1, effective March 1, 2022.

31-10.1-3.
Examination.

All applicants for a two-wheeled (2) motorcycle, motor scooter, or motor-driven cycle license, except those exempted in this chapter, shall pass a written, vision, road sign, and road test as prescribed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles in a vehicle supplied by the applicant.

All applicants for a three-wheeled (3) motorcycle, motor scooter, or motor-driven cycle license, except those exempted under this chapter, shall pass a written, vision, road sign, and road test, as prescribed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles in a vehicle supplied by the applicant.

An applicant who within six (6) months of having been certified by the department of elementary and secondary education as having passed a written examination, road sign, and road test administered by that department, shall, upon completion of an eyesight test by the division of motor vehicles, be considered in compliance with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 362, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 412, § 1, effective March 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 413, § 1, effective March 1, 2022.

31-10.1-4.
Required equipment.

Operators of motorcycles, motor scooters, and motor-driven cycles shall use eye protection of a type approved by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles when operating their vehicles on streets and highways. Every motorcycle, motor scooter, and motor-driven cycle shall be equipped with a rear view mirror. Any operator under the age of twenty-one (21) shall wear a helmet of a type approved by the administrator of motor vehicles. In addition, all new operators, regardless of age, shall be required, for a period of one year from the date of issuance of the first license pursuant to §

31-10.1-1

, to wear a helmet of a type approved by said administrator. Any person deemed in violation of this provision shall be subject to the fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

, which shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of chapter 41.1 of this title. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized to set forth rules and regulations governing the use of other equipment on those vehicles. All fines collected under this section shall be deposited in a general restricted receipt account for the use of the Rhode Island governor’s office on highway safety in order to promote educational and informational programs encouraging helmet use.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 364, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 105; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 8; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 6.

31-10.1-5.
Handlebars.

No person shall operate on a highway or in any parking area for ten (10) or more motor vehicles, any motorcycle, motor scooter, or motor driven cycle equipped with handlebars that are more than fifteen inches (15") in height above the uppermost portion of the seat when depressed by the weight of the operator. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 105.

31-10.1-6.
Passengers.

Any passenger on a motorcycle, motor scooter, or motor-driven cycle must be provided with a separate rear seat, a separate foot-rest, and an appropriate handlebar or grip for his or her use, and must wear a properly fitting helmet of a type approved by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. No person shall operate a motorcycle, motor scooter, or motor-driven cycle unless any passenger on it wears a helmet and is able to rest his or her feet upon a foot-rest. Any passenger on a motorcycle, motor scooter, or motor-driven cycle under twelve (12) years of age must have a properly secured back-rest or equivalent, shall have his or her feet placed upon the foot-rest, and shall be seated behind the operator unless a side car is provided. When, however, a side car is provided this age requirement shall not apply to any passenger(s) in the sidecar. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 364, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 299, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 105.

31-10.1-6.1.
Autocycles — Exemptions.

The provisions of §

31-10.1-1

through §

31-10.1-6

, inclusive, shall not apply to autocycles. Any person licensed as an operator or chauffeur pursuant to chapter 10 of this title may operate an autocycle.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 404, § 2.

31-10.1-7.
Inspection.

Every motorcycle, motor scooter, or motor driven cycle shall be inspected in accordance with the law providing for inspection of motor vehicles and shall display a certificate of inspection as provided in chapter 38 of this title. Inspection standards for the motor vehicles shall be established by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. Inspection stations shall be specially licensed to inspect motorcycles, motor scooters, and motor-driven cycles. Certificates of inspection for these vehicles shall be clearly distinguishable from those issued to other motor vehicles. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 105.

31-10.1-8.
Anatomical gifts by operators.

The division of motor vehicles, in conjunction with the federally designated organ and tissue procurement agency, shall develop and implement a program encouraging and allowing for persons to make anatomical gifts, during the process of issuing and renewing licenses provided for in §

31-10.1-1

. The division of motor vehicles shall give to all persons seeking the licenses, a document containing a summary description and explanation of the Anatomical Gift Act, chapter 18.6 of title 23. Any person wishing to donate tissue or organs under the provisions of chapter 18.6 of title 23 shall be included in the Rhode Island Donor Registry as defined by §

31-10-26.1(g)

and issued a driver’s license or nonoperator’s identification card bearing a notation or symbol indicating the person’s consent to donate under the chapter and defining the term “qualified donee” as outlined in chapter 18.6 of title 23. The division of motor vehicles, in conjunction with the federally designated organ and tissue procurement agency, may on behalf of the state, accept and deposit with the general treasurer any grant, gift or contribution made to assist in meeting the cost of carrying out the purposes of this section, and may expend the funds for these purposes.

Application for monies to support these purposes will be made to the general treasurer by the division of motor vehicles, and/or the federally designated organ and tissue procurement agency.

The division of motor vehicles may make and sign any agreements and may do and perform any and all acts necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 246, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 392, § 2.

31-10.1-9.
Recreational vehicles — Non-applicability.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the operation of recreational vehicles, as defined in §

31-3.2-1

, including all classes of all-terrain vehicles; nor shall they authorize their registration by the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 412, § 2, effective March 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 413, § 2, effective March 1, 2022.